Hawaii statutes.
§624-24 Arbitrators, etc. [(a)] An
arbitrator or other person, other than a court, having authority to hear,
receive and examine evidence, may order that the deposition of a witness be
taken within the State, or by leave of a circuit court outside the State, for
use as evidence in a pending civil matter, when the circumstances are such that
it is probable that the witness will not be able to, or will not be compellable
to, attend and give evidence before such person at the hearing. Except as
otherwise provided, the deposition shall be taken and may be used in the same
manner as is provided by the rules of court relating to depositions in civil
actions in circuit courts.

[(b)] Nothing herein contained limits or
affects any other power heretofore or hereafter conferred with respect to the
taking of depositions. [L 1972, c 143, §1(a)]

Rules of Court

See Hawaii Arbitration Rules.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next